Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1667.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be
codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:
The purpose of this act is:
1. To establish a grace period of fourteen (14) days for the
processing and completion of required professional development hours
for child care professionals, ensuring that administrative delays do
not negatively impact their employment status or certification; and
2. To ensure child care professionals have adequate time to
procure training in order to remain in compliance with the Child
Care Licensing Act and applicable administrative rules.

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1667 Page 1

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 405.6 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. A grace period of fourteen (14) days shall be granted to all
child care professionals to submit the required documentation for
the completion of their annual professional development training
hours as defined in Section 402 of this title.
B. During this grace period, the child care professional shall
remain in compliance with licensing and employment requirements.
C. Employers and regulatory agencies shall not impose
penalties, suspensions, or employment terminations solely based on
the pending processing of professional development hours during the
grace period.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 405.7 of Title 10, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The Department of Human Services shall ensure that the review
period for early childhood education provider training applications
is no greater than fourteen (14) days.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 10 O.S. 2021, Section 402, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 402. As used in the Oklahoma Child Care Facilities
Licensing Act:

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1667 Page 2

1. "Adult" means an individual eighteen (18) years of age or
older;
2. "Child" or "minor" means any person who has not attained the
age of eighteen (18) years;
3. "Child care center" means a program that operates thirty
(30) or more hours per week;
4. "Child care facility" means any public or private child care
residential facility, child-placing agency, foster family home,
child care center, part-day program, out-of-school time program, day
camp, drop-in program, program for sick children, family child care
home, or large family child care home providing either full-time or
part-time care for children away from their own homes;
5. "Child care professional" means any individual employed in a
licensed child care facility, including, but not limited to,
teachers, aides, and administrators, who are required to complete
professional development hours;
6. "Child-placing agency" means an agency that arranges for or
places a child in a foster family home, adoptive home, or
independent living program;
6. 7. "Foster family home" means the private residence of a
family which provides foster care services to a child, and includes
a specialized foster home, a therapeutic foster family home, or a
kinship care home;

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1667 Page 3

7. 8. "Foster parent eligibility assessment" includes a
criminal background investigation, including, but not limited to, a
national criminal history records search based upon the submission
of fingerprints, a home assessment, and any other assessment
required by the Department of Human Services, the Office of Juvenile
Affairs, or any child-placing agency pursuant to the provisions of
Section 1-7-106 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes. A foster
parent eligibility assessment shall be similar to the procedures
used by the Department of Public Safety for determining suitability
of an individual for employment as a highway patrol officer;
8. 9. "Department" means the Department of Human Services;
9. 10. "Division" means the section within the Department that
is assigned responsibilities pursuant to the provisions of the
Oklahoma Child Care Facilities Licensing Act;
10. 11. "Family child care home" means a family home which
provides care and supervision for seven or fewer children for part
of the twenty-four-hour day. The term "family child care home"
shall not include informal arrangements which parents make
independently with neighbors, friends, and others, or with
caretakers in the child's own home;
11. 12. "Full-time care" means continuous care given to a child
beyond a minimum period of twenty-four (24) hours;


ENGR. H. B. NO. 1667 Page 4

12. 13. "Large family child care home" means a residential
family home which provides care and supervision for eight to twelve
children for part of the twenty-four-hour day;
13. 14. "Part-day child care program" means a program that
provides care and supervision for children and that operates for
more than fifteen (15) and up to thirty (30) hours per week;
15. "Professional development hours" means the training and
educational requirements mandated by state or local regulatory
agencies for child care professionals to maintain their
certification or licensure;
14. 16. "Program" means the business entity that provides care,
supervision, and learning opportunities for children;
15. 17. "Rap back" means a notification from the Oklahoma State
Bureau of Investigation to the Department of subsequent criminal
activity of individuals whose criminal background checks have been
completed pursuant to the requirements of the Oklahoma Child Care
Facilities Licensing Act;
18. "Regulatory agency" means any state or local government
agency responsible for overseeing child care licensing and
certification;
16. 19. "Residential child care facility" means a twenty-four-
hour residential facility where children live together with or are
supervised by adults who are not their parents or relatives;

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1667 Page 5

17. 20. "Responsible entity" means an individual who is
authorized to obligate the business; and
18. 21. "Specialized service professional" means an individual
from an academic discipline or field of expertise who provides
individualized services to a child, such as behavioral or physical
therapists.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
Passed the House of Representatives the 17th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate









ENGR. H. B. NO. 1667 Page 6